Washington statutes.
RCW 12.08.040

Docketing or filing.

When the pleadings are oral, the substance of them shall be entered by the justice in his or her docket. When in writing they shall be filed in his or her office and a reference made to them in his or her docket. Pleadings shall not be required to be in any particular form, but shall be such as to enable a person of common understanding to know what is intended.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3018; Code 1881 s 1759; 1873 p 345 s 58; 1854 p 231 s 46; RRS s 1781.]